Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

Fire Protection Sprinkler Systems

62-32-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Fire protection sprinkler system” means an assembly of underground or overhead piping or conduit, including fire pumps, valves and fire hydrants, that conveys water or other agents to dispersal openings or devices to extinguish, control or contain fire and to provide protection from exposure to fire or other products of combustion; provided, that “fire protection sprinkler system” does not include public water service mains;

“Fire protection sprinkler system contractor” means a person that contracts, offers to contract or represents that the person is able to contract with a general contractor, subcontractor or the general public for the undertaking of the sale, installation or service of a fire protection sprinkler system or any part of a fire protection sprinkler system or that actually installs or services a fire protection sprinkler system; provided, that an owner of real property on which a fire protection sprinkler system is located or a full-time employee of the owner of real property on which a fire protection sprinkler system is located may perform simple maintenance of the fire protection sprinkler system, such as replacing a sprinkler head;

“Installation” means the initial placement of fire protection equipment or the extension, modification or alteration of equipment after initial placement. “Installation” includes work throughout the entire fire protection sprinkler system;

“Person” means a natural person, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, governmental entity or any other legal entity;

“Responsible managing employee” means an individual who is or is designated to be in active and responsible charge of the work of a fire protection sprinkler system contractor; and

“Work in progress” means any work for which bids are complete and a contractual agreement has been reached among the parties but the necessary labor to fulfill the contract is not yet complete.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 1986, ch. 721, § 17; 1987, ch. 268, § 1; 2002, ch. 624, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 183, § 1.

Cross-References. Fire extinguishers and related equipment, title 62, chapter 32, part 2.

Fire protection and sprinkler systems, parking garages and bus terminals, § 68-101-103.

Rural fire protection equipment, title 4, ch. 31, part 5.

Smoke alarms in dwellings and residential buildings, §§ 68-120-111, 68-120-112.

62-32-102. Exemptions.

This part shall not apply to:

A registered professional architect or engineer acting solely in that professional capacity;

A regular employee of a fire protection sprinkler system contractor acting under its control and supervision; or

A person selling or supplying products or materials to a registered fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 2; 1985, ch. 209, § 2.

62-32-103. Administration of part — Rules — Testing materials.

This part shall be administered by the department.

The state fire marshal may promulgate rules that are reasonably necessary to ensure the effective administration of this part. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The National Institute for Certification in Engineering Technology (NICET) testing material shall be used to determine qualification to act as a responsible managing employee. The testing materials shall be reviewed for any changes by the department on an annual basis to determine their consistency with the purposes, goals and application of this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 3; 1985, ch. 209, § 3; 2005, ch. 183, § 2.

62-32-104. Prohibited activities.

No person shall:

Act as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor without a valid certificate of registration issued by the department; provided, that a partnership or joint venture may act as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor without a certificate of registration if and only if each partner or joint venturer is duly registered;

Act as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor under a certificate of registration without having on staff a responsible managing employee who holds a valid license issued by the department. A person holding a valid certificate of registration may continue work in progress for ninety (90) days after the death or disassociation of its licensed responsible managing employee or for a longer period that may be approved pursuant to rules adopted under this part;

Act as a responsible managing employee for a fire protection sprinkler system contractor without a valid license issued by the department; or

Sell, install or service a fire protection sprinkler system in violation of this part or the rules adopted under this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 4; 1985, ch. 209, § 4; 1987, ch. 268, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 183, § 2.

62-32-105. Application for certification of registration as contractor.

An application for a certificate of registration as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the department.

The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable application fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); and

A surety bond executed by the applicant and a surety company authorized to do business in this state, made payable to the state of Tennessee in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The bond shall be for the use and benefit of any person who may be injured or aggrieved by a wrongful act or omission of an employee, servant, officer or agent in the conduct of business of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor. Any person so injured or aggrieved may sue directly on the bond without assignment of the bond.

The bonding requirement of this section shall not apply to any person who is licensed to engage in fire protection sprinkler system work by the board for licensing contractors under chapter 6 of this title.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 5.

62-32-106. Application for license as responsible managing employee.

An application for a license as a responsible managing employee shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

One (1) of the following documents must accompany the application to evidence technical qualifications for a license:

Proof of registration in this state as a professional engineer or architect; or

A copy of a NICET notification letter regarding the applicant's successful completion of the examination requirements for certification at Level III for fire protection automatic sprinkler systems layout.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 6; 1985, ch. 209, § 5.

62-32-107. Issuance of certificates and licenses — Copies — Transferability.

The department shall issue to qualified applicants a certificate of registration as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor upon receipt of a fee in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

The department shall issue to qualified applicants a license as a responsible managing employee upon receipt of a fee in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

Upon written request, the department shall issue a revised certificate.

Upon written request accompanied by a fee in an amount not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00), the department shall issue a duplicate certificate of registration or license.

No certificate of registration or license shall be transferable.

No certificate of registration or license will be issued to any individual under eighteen (18) years of age.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 7; 1985, ch. 209, § 6; 2005, ch. 183, § 2.

62-32-108. Posting of certificates and licenses — Number and expiration date to be conspicuous.

Each certificate of registration and license issued under this part shall be conspicuously posted in the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's place of business.

All bids, advertising, promotions or solicitations for the sale, installation or service of fire protection sprinkler systems shall prominently indicate the certificate of registration number and expiration date of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 8; 1987, ch. 268, § 4.

62-32-109. Bond requirements — Effect of invalid bond — Liability of surety.

The bond required by § 62-32-105 shall be in effect at all times and places in which the fire protection sprinkler system contractor engages in business in this state. If the bond ceases to be in effect, the certificate of registration of the contractor shall become invalid.

In no event shall the aggregate liability of the surety exceed the amount of the bond.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 9.

62-32-110. Expiration of certificates and licenses — Notice — Renewal — Fees.

At least thirty (30) days before the expiration of a certificate of registration or license, the department shall send written notice of the impending expiration to the registrant or licensee at the registrant's or licensee's last known address.

All certificates of registration and licenses issued under this part shall expire on June 30 of each year and shall be invalid on that date unless renewed. The certificates and licenses may be renewed on or before the expiration date by remitting to the department a renewal fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

Certificates of registration and licenses shall be subject to late renewal for a period of ninety (90) days following their expiration date by payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty of one half (½) of the renewal fee. Any person desiring reinstatement thereafter must reapply for registration or licensure.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 10.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules establishing renewal dates of licenses, certificates or permits, § 56-1-302.

62-32-111. Refusal to issue or renew certificate or license — Suspension or revocation.

The state fire marshal may refuse to issue, renew, suspend, or revoke a certificate of registration or license under this part, if the state fire marshal finds that the applicant, registrant, or licensee has violated this part or any rule lawfully promulgated under this part, including, but not limited to:

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of registration or license by fraudulent misrepresentation; or

Willfully or consistently failing to comply with any applicable code or standard relating to the sale, installation, or service of fire protection sprinkler systems.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 11; 1985, ch. 209, § 7; 1987, ch. 268, § 5; 2015, ch. 381, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 381, § 7 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to violations occurring on or after May 8, 2015.

62-32-112. Submission of installation plans for review.

A registered fire protection sprinkler system contractor, through its responsible managing employee, may submit shop drawings of proposed fire protection sprinkler system installations in projects whose construction plans and specifications are subject to review by the department. Upon receipt of the prescribed review fee, the department shall review and approve or disapprove the shop drawings.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 12; 1985, ch. 209, § 8; 2005, ch. 183, § 2.

62-32-113. Disposition of fees.

All fees collected under this part shall constitute expendable receipts of the department for use in administering this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 16; 2005, ch. 183, § 2.

62-32-114. Uniformity of application and effect — Powers of political subdivisions.

This part and the rules promulgated under this part shall have uniform force and effect throughout the state. No political subdivision of this state may adopt or enforce any order, ordinance, rule or regulation requiring any person to obtain any form of permission from the political subdivision to act as a fire protection sprinkler system contractor. A political subdivision may require a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to pay for and obtain a permit for the installation of a fire protection sprinkler system and require the installation to conform with applicable building codes and requirements; however, the political subdivision may not impose on fire protection sprinkler system contractors qualification or financial responsibility requirements other than proof of a valid certificate of registration issued under this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 15.

62-32-115. Act supplemental.

This part is supplemental to chapter 6 of this title.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 17.

62-32-116. Procedure governing contested cases.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 13.

62-32-117. Penalties.

A violation of this part or any rule lawfully promulgated under this part is a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalty set forth in subsection (a):

The state fire marshal shall, upon receipt of the first violation, send a written notice of violation which shall include the possible actions that may be taken in response to any second or subsequent violation;

The state fire marshal may issue the following civil penalties for second or subsequent violations of this part or the rules lawfully promulgated under this part:

For a second violation, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

For a third violation, a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500); and

For a fourth or subsequent violation, a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Acts 1984, ch. 949, § 14; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2015, ch. 381, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 381, § 7 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to violations occurring on or after May 8, 2015.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.